Utah statutes.
53A-13-108.5.   Acceptance of credits and grades awarded by accredited schools.

(1) (a)  A public school shall accept credits and grades awarded to a student by a school accredited or approved by the State Board of Education or accredited or recognized by the Northwest Association of Accredited Schools as issued by the school, without alterations.

(b)  Credits awarded for a core curriculum course shall be applied to fulfilling core curriculum requirements.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies to credits awarded to a student who:

(a)  transfers to a public school; or

(b)  while enrolled in the public school, takes courses offered by another public or private school.

(3)  Subsection (1) applies to:

(a)  traditional classes in which an instructor is present in the classroom and the student is required to attend the class for a particular length of time;

(b)  open entry/open exit classes in which the student has the flexibility to begin or end study at any time, progress through course material at his own pace, and demonstrate competency when knowledge and skills have been mastered;

(c)  courses offered over the Internet; or

(d)  distance learning courses.

